District of Columbia statutes.
7-2551.02

Liability.

Any manufacturer, importer, or dealer of an assault weapon or machine gun shall be held strictly liable in tort, without regard to fault or proof of defect, for all direct and consequential damages that arise from bodily injury or death if the bodily injury or death proximately results from the discharge of the assault weapon or machine gun in the District of Columbia.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-263, § 4, 37 DCR 8482
Oct. 7, 1994, D.C. Law 10-194, § 3(a), 41 DCR 4283
Application of Law 8-263: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-2551.01.
Pursuant to the Court’s holding in Bliley v. Kelly, 23 F.3d 507 (D.C.Cir.1994), the Congressional review period for the Assault Weapon Manufacturing Strict Liability Act of 1990, began to run on November 19, 1991, and the act took effect on February 29, 1992.
1981 Ed., § 6-2392.